Arkansas, session 2025, HB1895.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-22-211(d), concerning exceptions to the
prohibition against a corporation or association practicing law, is amended
to read as follows:
(d) This section does not apply to a:
(1) For-profit corporation or voluntary association lawfully
engaged in:
(A) The examination and insuring of titles to real
property; or
(B)(i) Employing an attorney or attorneys in and about its
own or its affiliates' immediate affairs or in any litigation to which it or
its affiliates is or may become a party.
*CEB263*
03/31/2025 9:31:34 AM CEB263

HB1895
(ii) As used in this subsection, "affiliate" means a
corporation, limited liability company, partnership of any type, or other
voluntary association that is related to another entity by shareholdings,
membership interests, partnership interests, or other means of control,
including without limitation a direct or indirect subsidiary, parent, or
sibling entity;
(2) Nonprofit corporation or voluntary association lawfully
engaged in representing or assisting an indigent, poor, or disadvantaged
person as a client in a civil or criminal matter, if any legal services
rendered by the nonprofit corporation or voluntary association are furnished
through licensed attorneys in accordance with rules governing the practice of
law in Arkansas; or
(3) Nonprofit corporation, voluntary association, or
instrumentality of the government recognized under 26 U.S.C. § 115 that is
engaged in representing or assisting as a client in a civil matter one (1) of
the following entities, if any legal services rendered are furnished through
licensed attorneys in accordance with rules governing the practice of law in
Arkansas:
(A) A city, county, or public school district;
(B) The officers and employees of a city, county, or
public school district;
(C) A self-funding group of a city, county, or public
school district as required under § 14-60-101 et seq., § 14-26-101 et seq.,
or § 6-17-1401 et seq.; or
(D) A self-insurance risk pool of a city, county, or
public school district.










03/31/2025 9:31:34 AM CEB263